Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1015.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "office of community violence intervention and prevention services act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Department" means the department of health and human services. (b) "Eligible local unit of government" means that term as defined in the community violence intervention and prevention act. (c) "Fund" means the fund as that term is defined in the community violence intervention and prevention act. (d) "Grant program" means the program as that term is defined in the community violence intervention and prevention act. (e) "Office of community violence intervention and prevention services" or "office" means the office of community violence intervention and prevention services created in section 5. Sec. 5. The office of community violence intervention and prevention services is created within the department. Sec. 7. The department shall establish procedures for the office for budgeting, expending money, and employing personnel according to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 9. The office may, upon appropriation, award grants to carry out the purposes of this act and as otherwise provided by law. Sec. 11. The office shall do all of the following: (a) Administer the fund and the grant program. (b) Maintain data on community violence trends in this state. (c) Provide technical assistance to community-based nonprofit organizations that serve the residents in an eligible local unit of government. (d) Establish measurable statewide goals for reducing and preventing shootings, aggravated assaults, and homicides. (e) Publish annual guidance and standardized reporting requirements for recipients of grants under the grant program. (f) Serve as the coordinating entity for all community violence intervention and prevention initiatives in this state. (g) Develop and publish best practices for community violence intervention and prevention programs, including, but not limited to, programs involving youth. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 1016 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.